Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 9A Woman’s Right to Know

Cross references.

Abortions not to be performed by physician assistants, §

43-34-110

.

Law reviews.

For article on 2005 enactment of this chapter, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 147 (2005).

For annual survey on healthcare law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 1053 (2019).

31-9A-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Woman’s Right to Know Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1450, § 6/HB 197.

31-9A-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Abortion” means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance or device with the intent to terminate the pregnancy of a female known to be pregnant. The term “abortion” shall not include the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance or device employed solely to increase the probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the child after live birth, or to remove a dead unborn child who died as the result of a spontaneous abortion. The term “abortion” also shall not include the prescription or use of contraceptives.

“Medical emergency” means any condition which, in reasonable medical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of a pregnant female as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create serious risk of substantial or irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant woman or death of the unborn child. No such condition shall be deemed to exist if it is based on a diagnosis or claim of a mental or emotional condition of the pregnant woman or that the pregnant woman will purposefully engage in conduct which she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function.

“Physician” means a person licensed to practice medicine under Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 43.

“Probable gestational age of the unborn child” means the physician’s best professional estimate of the probable gestational age of the unborn child at the time an abortion is to be performed.

“Qualified agent” means the agent of the physician who is a patient educator, licensed psychologist, licensed social worker, licensed professional counselor, licensed physician assistant, registered nurse, or physician.

“Secure Internet website” means a website that is safeguarded from having its content altered other than by the commissioner of public health.

“Unborn child” or “fetus” means a member of the species homo sapiens from fertilization until birth.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1450, § 6/HB 197; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 3/HB 509; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 575, § 5/HB 954.

Cross references.

Coverage of certain abortions through certain qualified health plans prohibited, §

33-24-59.17

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 575, § 1/HB 954, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly makes the following findings:

“(1) At least by 20 weeks after fertilization there is substantial evidence that an unborn child has the physical structures necessary to experience pain;

“(2) There is substantial evidence that, by 20 weeks after fertilization, unborn children seek to evade certain stimuli in a manner which in an infant or an adult would be interpreted as a response to pain;

“(3) Anesthesia is routinely administered to unborn children who have developed 20 weeks or more past fertilization who undergo prenatal surgery;

“(4) Even before 20 weeks after fertilization, unborn children have been observed to exhibit hormonal stress responses to painful stimuli. Such responses were reduced when pain medication was administered directly to such unborn children;

“(4.1) Probable gestational age is an estimate made to assume the closest time to which the fertilization of a human ovum occurred and does not purport to be an exact diagnosis of when such fertilization occurred; and

“(5) It is the purpose of the State of Georgia to assert a compelling state interest in protecting the lives of unborn children from the stage at which substantial medical evidence indicates that they are capable of feeling pain.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 253 (2012).

31-9A-3.
Voluntary and informed consent to abortion; availability of ultrasound.

No abortion shall be performed in this state except with the voluntary and informed consent of the female upon whom the abortion is to be performed. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to an abortion is voluntary and informed if and only if:

The female is told the following, by telephone or in person, by the physician who is to perform the abortion, by a qualified agent of the physician who is to perform the abortion, by a qualified agent of a referring physician, or by a referring physician, at least 24 hours before the abortion:

The particular medical risks to the individual patient associated with the particular abortion procedure to be employed, when medically accurate;

The probable gestational age and presence of a detectable human heartbeat, as such term is defined in Code Section 1-2-1, of an unborn child at the time the abortion would be performed; and

The medical risks associated with carrying an unborn child to term.

The information required by this paragraph may be provided by telephone without conducting a physical examination or tests of the patient, in which case the information required to be provided may be based on facts supplied to the physician by the female and whatever other relevant information is reasonably available to the physician.
Such information may not be provided by a tape recording but must be provided during a consultation in which the physician or a qualified agent of the physician is able to ask questions of the female and the female is able to ask questions of the physician or the physician’s qualified agent.
If in the medical judgment of the physician any physical examination, tests, or other information subsequently provided to the physician requires a revision of the information previously supplied to the patient, that revised information shall be communicated to the patient prior to the performance of the abortion.
Nothing in this Code section may be construed to preclude provision of required information in a language understood by the patient through a translator;

The female is informed, by telephone or in person, by the physician who is to perform the abortion, by a referring physician, or by a qualified agent of the physician who is to perform the abortion at least 24 hours before the abortion:

That medical assistance benefits may be available for prenatal care, childbirth, and neonatal care;

That the father will be liable pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 19-7-49 to assist in the support of her child;

How to obtain a list of health care providers, facilities, and clinics that offer to perform ultrasounds free of charge; such list shall be arranged geographically and shall include the name, address, hours of operation, and telephone number of each listed entity; and

That she has the right to review the printed materials described in Code Section 31-9A-4 and that these materials are available on a state sponsored website at a stated website address. The physician or the physician’s qualified agent shall orally inform the female that materials have been provided by the State of Georgia and that they describe the unborn child, list agencies that offer alternatives to abortion, and contain information on fetal pain. If the female chooses to view the materials other than on the website, they shall either be given to her at least 24 hours before the abortion or mailed to her at least 72 hours before the abortion by certified mail, restricted delivery to addressee.

The information required by this paragraph may be provided by a tape recording if provision is made to record or otherwise register specifically whether the female does or does not choose to review the printed materials other than on the website;

The female certifies in writing, prior to the abortion, that the information described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this Code section has been furnished her and that she has been informed of her opportunity to review the information referred to in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of this Code section;

For all cases in which an ultrasound is performed prior to conducting an abortion or a pre-abortion screen:

The woman shall at the conclusion of the ultrasound be offered the opportunity to view the fetal image and hear the fetal heartbeat. The active ultrasound image shall be of a quality consistent with standard medical practice in the community, contain the dimensions of the unborn child, and accurately portray the presence of external members and internal organs, including but not limited to the heartbeat, if present or viewable, of the unborn child. The auscultation of fetal heart tone shall be of a quality consistent with standard medical practice in the community; and

At the conclusion of these actions and prior to the abortion, the female certifies in writing that:

She was provided the opportunity described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

Whether or not she elected to view the sonogram; and

Whether or not she elected to listen to the fetal heartbeat, if present; and

Prior to the performance of the abortion, the physician who is to perform the abortion or the physician’s qualified agent receives a copy of the written certifications prescribed by paragraphs (3) and (4) of this Code section and retains them on file with the female’s medical record for at least three years following the date of receipt.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1450, § 6/HB 197; Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 3/HB 147; Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 7/HB 481.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted “an unborn child” for “the unborn child” in subparagraphs (1)(B) and (1)(C); and inserted “and presence of a detectable human heartbeat, as such term is defined in Code Section 1-2-1,” in subparagraph (1)(B).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 1/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Woman’s Ultrasound Right to Know Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 2/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) It is essential to the psychological and physical well-being of a woman considering an abortion that she receive complete and accurate information on the reality and status of her pregnancy and of her unborn child;

“(2) The decision to abort ‘is an important and often a stressful one, and it is desirable and imperative that it be made with full knowledge of its nature and consequences.’

Planned Parenthood v. Danforth

, 428 U.S. 52, 67 (1976); and

“(3) The knowledgeable exercise of a woman’s decision to have an abortion depends on the extent to which the woman receives sufficient information to make an informed choice between two alternatives: giving birth or having an abortion.

“(b) Based on the findings in subsection (a) of this section, it is the purpose of this Act to:

“(1) Ensure that every woman considering an abortion receive complete information on the reality and status of her pregnancy and of her unborn child and that every woman submitting to an abortion do so only after giving her voluntary and informed consent to the abortion procedure;

“(2) Protect unborn children from a woman’s uninformed decision to have an abortion;

“(3) Reduce ‘the risk that a woman may elect an abortion, only to discover later, with devastating psychological consequences, that her decision was not fully informed’

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

, 505 U.S. 833, 882 (1992); and

“(4) Adopt the construction of the term ‘medical emergency’ accepted by the United States Supreme Court in

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

, 505 U.S. 833 (1992).”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 7/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed as creating or recognizing a right to abortion.
It is not the intention of this Act to make lawful an abortion that is currently unlawful.”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 8/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 1/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Living Infants Fairness and Equality (LIFE) Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 2/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly of Georgia makes the following findings:”

“(1) In the founding of the United States of America, the State of Georgia and the several states affirmed that: ‘We hold these Truths to be self evident, that all Men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of Happiness —
that to secure these Rights, Governments are instituted among men;’

“(2) To protect the fundamental rights of all persons, and specifically to protect the fundamental rights of particular classes of persons who had not previously been recognized under law, the 14th Amendment to the United States Constitution was ratified, providing that, ‘nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws’;

“(3) Modern medical science, not available decades ago, demonstrates that unborn children are a class of living, distinct persons and more expansive state recognition of unborn children as persons did not exist when

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

(1992) and

Roe v. Wade

(1973) established abortion related precedents;

“(4) The State of Georgia, applying reasoned judgment to the full body of modern medical science, recognizes the benefits of providing full legal recognition to an unborn child above the minimum requirements of federal law;

“(5) Article I, Section I, Paragraphs I and II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia affirm that ‘[n]o person shall be deprived of life, liberty, or property except by due process of law’; and that ‘[p]rotection to person and property is the paramount duty of government and shall be impartial and complete.
No person shall be denied the equal protection of the laws’; and

“(6) It shall be the policy of the State of Georgia to recognize unborn children as natural persons.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 13/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any citizen of this state shall have standing and the right to intervene and defend in any action challenging the constitutionality of any portion of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 14/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “All provisions of this Act shall be severable in accordance with Code Section 1-1-3.”

Law reviews.

For note on 2007 amendment of this Code
section, see 24 Ga. St. U. L.
Rev. 161 (2007).

For article, “Crimes and Offenses,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 209 (2011).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (2019).

31-9A-4.
Information to be made available by the Department of Public Health; format requirements; availability; requirements for website.

The Department of Public Health shall cause to be published in English and in each language which is the primary language of 2 percent or more of the state’s population and shall cause to be available on the state website provided for in subsection (d) of this Code section the following printed materials in such a way as to ensure that the information is easily comprehensible:

Geographically indexed materials designed to inform the female of public and private agencies and services available to assist a female through pregnancy, upon childbirth, and while the child is dependent, including adoption agencies, which shall include a comprehensive list of the agencies available, a description of the services they offer, and a description of the manner, including telephone numbers and website addresses, in which they might be contacted or, at the option of such department, printed materials including a toll-free, 24 hour telephone number which may be called to obtain, orally or by a tape recorded message tailored to the ZIP Code entered by the caller, such a list and description of agencies in the locality of the caller and of the services they offer;

(1.1)

Geographically indexed materials designed to inform the female of public and private facilities and services available to assist a female with obtaining an ultrasound which shall include a comprehensive list of the facilities available, a description of the services they offer, and a description of the manner, including telephone numbers and website addresses, in which they might be contacted or, at the option of such department, printed materials including a toll-free, 24 hour telephone number which may be called to obtain, orally or by a tape recorded message tailored to the ZIP Code entered by the caller, such a list and description of facilities in the locality of the caller and of the services they offer;

Materials designed to inform the female of the probable anatomical and physiological characteristics of the unborn child at two-week gestational increments from the time when a female can be known to be pregnant to full term, including any relevant information on the possibility of the unborn child’s survival and pictures representing the development of unborn children at two-week gestational increments, provided that any such pictures must contain the dimensions of the fetus and must be factually accurate for the stage of pregnancy depicted. The materials shall be objective, nonjudgmental, and designed to convey only factually accurate scientific information about the unborn child at the various gestational ages. The material shall also contain objective information describing the methods of abortion procedures commonly employed, the medical risks commonly associated with each such procedure, the possible detrimental psychological effects of abortion, and the medical risks commonly associated with carrying a child to term; and

Materials with the following statement concerning unborn children with a detectable human heartbeat, as such term is defined in Code Section 1-2-1, and of 20 weeks’ or more gestational age:

“As early as six weeks’ gestation, an unborn child may have a detectable human heartbeat. By 20 weeks’ gestation, an unborn child has the physical structures necessary to experience pain. There is evidence that by 20 weeks’ gestation unborn children seek to evade certain stimuli in a manner which in an infant or an adult would be interpreted to be a response to pain. Anesthesia is routinely administered to unborn children who are 20 weeks’ gestational age or older who undergo prenatal surgery.”

The materials shall be objective, nonjudgmental, and designed to convey only accurate scientific information about an unborn child at the various gestational ages.

The materials referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be printed in a typeface large enough to be clearly legible. All pictures and print appearing on the website shall be clearly legible. All information and pictures shall be accessible with an industry standard browser, requiring no additional plug-ins.

The materials required under this Code section shall be available at no cost from the Department of Public Health upon request and in a reasonably appropriate number to any person, facility, or hospital.

The Department of Public Health shall develop and maintain a secure internet website to provide the information described in this Code section. No information regarding who uses the website shall be collected or maintained. The Department of Public Health shall monitor the website on a weekly basis to prevent and correct tampering.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9A-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1450, § 6/HB 197; Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 4/HB 147; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 8/HB 481; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 31/HB 1428.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, inserted “with a detectable human heartbeat, as such term is defined in Code Section 1-2-1, and” in paragraph (a)(3); in the ending undesignated paragraphs following paragraph (a)(3), substituted “an unborn child” for “the unborn child” in the second sentence of the statement and near the end of the second undesignated paragraph; and added the first sentence in the statement paragraph.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “internet” for “Internet” in the first sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 1/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Woman’s Ultrasound Right to Know Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 2/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) It is essential to the psychological and physical well-being of a woman considering an abortion that she receive complete and accurate information on the reality and status of her pregnancy and of her unborn child;

“(2) The decision to abort ‘is an important and often a stressful one, and it is desirable and imperative that it be made with full knowledge of its nature and consequences.’

Planned Parenthood v. Danforth

, 428 U.S. 52, 67 (1976); and

“(3) The knowledgeable exercise of a woman’s decision to have an abortion depends on the extent to which the woman receives sufficient information to make an informed choice between two alternatives: giving birth or having an abortion.

“(b) Based on the findings in subsection (a) of this section, it is the purpose of this Act to:

“(1) Ensure that every woman considering an abortion receive complete information on the reality and status of her pregnancy and of her unborn child and that every woman submitting to an abortion do so only after giving her voluntary and informed consent to the abortion procedure;

“(2) Protect unborn children from a woman’s uninformed decision to have an abortion;

“(3) Reduce ‘the risk that a woman may elect an abortion, only to discover later, with devastating psychological consequences, that her decision was not fully informed’

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

, 505 U.S. 833, 882 (1992); and

“(4) Adopt the construction of the term ‘medical emergency’ accepted by the United States Supreme Court in

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

, 505 U.S. 833 (1992).”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 7/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed as creating or recognizing a right to abortion.
It is not the intention of this Act to make lawful an abortion that is currently unlawful.”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 8/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 1/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Living Infants Fairness and Equality (LIFE) Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 2/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly of Georgia makes the following findings:”

“(1) In the founding of the United States of America, the State of Georgia and the several states affirmed that: ‘We hold these Truths to be self evident, that all Men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of Happiness —
that to secure these Rights, Governments are instituted among men;’

“(2) To protect the fundamental rights of all persons, and specifically to protect the fundamental rights of particular classes of persons who had not previously been recognized under law, the 14th Amendment to the United States Constitution was ratified, providing that, ‘nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws’;

“(3) Modern medical science, not available decades ago, demonstrates that unborn children are a class of living, distinct persons and more expansive state recognition of unborn children as persons did not exist when

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

(1992) and

Roe v. Wade

(1973) established abortion related precedents;

“(4) The State of Georgia, applying reasoned judgment to the full body of modern medical science, recognizes the benefits of providing full legal recognition to an unborn child above the minimum requirements of federal law;

“(5) Article I, Section I, Paragraphs I and II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia affirm that ‘[n]o person shall be deprived of life, liberty, or property except by due process of law’; and that ‘[p]rotection to person and property is the paramount duty of government and shall be impartial and complete.
No person shall be denied the equal protection of the laws’; and

“(6) It shall be the policy of the State of Georgia to recognize unborn children as natural persons.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 13/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any citizen of this state shall have standing and the right to intervene and defend in any action challenging the constitutionality of any portion of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 14/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “All provisions of this Act shall be severable in accordance with Code Section 1-1-3.”

Law reviews.

For note on 2007 amendment of this Code
section, see 24 Ga. St. U. L.
Rev. 161 (2007).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (2019).

31-9A-5.
Requirements in case of medical emergency.

When a medical emergency compels the performance of an abortion, the physician shall inform the female prior to the abortion, if medically reasonable and prudent, of the medical indications supporting the physician’s judgment that an abortion is medically necessary to avert her death or that a 24 hour delay will create serious risk of substantial or irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.

Any physician who complies with subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be held civilly liable to a patient for failure to obtain informed consent to an abortion.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9A-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1450, § 6/HB 197.

31-9A-6.
Reporting requirements.

The Department of Public Health shall prepare a reporting form for physicians performing abortions in a health facility licensed as an abortion facility by the Department of Community Health containing a reprint of this chapter and listing:

The number of females to whom the physician provided the information described in paragraph (1) of Code Section 31-9A-3; of that number, the number to whom the information was provided by telephone and the number to whom the information was provided in person; and of each of those numbers, the number to whom the information was provided by a referring physician and the number to whom the information was provided by a physician who is to perform the abortion;

The number of females to whom the physician or a qualified agent of the physician provided the information described in paragraph (2) of Code Section 31-9A-3; of that number, the number to whom the information was provided by telephone and the number to whom the information was provided in person; of each of those numbers, the number to whom the information was provided by a referring physician and the number to whom the information was provided by a physician who is to perform the abortion; and of each of those numbers, the number to whom the information was provided by the physician and the number to whom the information was provided by a qualified agent of the physician;

The number of females who availed themselves of the opportunity to obtain a copy of the printed information described in Code Section 31-9A-4, other than on the website, and the number who did not; and of each of those numbers, the number who, to the best of the reporting physician’s information and belief, went on to obtain the abortion; and

The number of females who were provided the opportunity to view the fetal image and hear the fetal heartbeat; of that number, the number who elected to view the sonogram and the number who elected to listen to the fetal heartbeat, if present.

The Department of Public Health shall ensure that copies of the reporting forms described in subsection (a) of this Code section are provided:

Not later than September 7, 2005, to all health facilities licensed as an abortion facility by the Department of Community Health;

To each physician licensed or who subsequently becomes licensed to practice in this state, at the same time as official notification to that physician that the physician is so licensed; and

By December 1 of each year, other than the calendar year in which forms are distributed in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection, to all health facilities licensed as an abortion facility by the Department of Community Health.

By February 28 of each year following a calendar year in any part of which this chapter was in effect, each physician who provided, or whose qualified agent provided, information to one or more females in accordance with Code Section 31-9A-3 during the previous calendar year shall submit to the Department of Public Health a copy of the form described in subsection (a) of this Code section with the requested data entered accurately and completely.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to preclude the voluntary or required submission of other reports or forms regarding abortions.

Reports that are not submitted within a grace period of 30 days following the due date shall be subject to a late fee of $500.00 for that period and the same fee for each additional 30 day period or portion of a 30 day period the reports are overdue. Any physician required to submit a report in accordance with this Code section who submits an incomplete report or fails to submit a report for more than one year following the due date may, in an action brought by the Department of Public Health, be directed by a court of competent jurisdiction to submit a complete report within a period stated by court order or may be subject to sanctions for civil contempt.

By June 30 of each year, the Department of Public Health shall issue a public report providing statistics for the previous calendar year compiled from all of the reports covering that year submitted in accordance with this Code section for each of the items listed in subsection (a) of this Code section. Each report shall also provide the statistics for all previous calendar years adjusted to reflect any additional information from late or corrected reports. The Department of Public Health shall ensure that none of the information included in the public reports could reasonably lead to the identification of any individual who provided information in accordance with Code Section 31-9A-3 or 31-9A-4.

The Department of Public Health may, by regulation, alter the dates established by subsection (c) or (e) of this Code section or paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section or may consolidate the forms or reports described in this Code section with other forms or reports for reasons including, but not limited to, achieving administrative convenience or fiscal savings or reducing the burden of reporting requirements, so long as reporting forms are sent to all facilities licensed as an abortion facility by the Department of Community Health at least once every year and the report described in subsection (f) of this Code section is issued at least once every year.

The Department of Public Health shall ensure that the names and identities of the physicians filing reports under this chapter shall remain confidential. The names and identities of such physicians shall not be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9A-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1450, § 6/HB 197; Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 5/HB 147; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-14/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, “Not later than September 7, 2005,” was substituted for “Within 120 days after this chapter first becomes effective,” in paragraph (b)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 1/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Woman’s Ultrasound Right to Know Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 2/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) It is essential to the psychological and physical well-being of a woman considering an abortion that she receive complete and accurate information on the reality and status of her pregnancy and of her unborn child;

“(2) The decision to abort ‘is an important and often a stressful one, and it is desirable and imperative that it be made with full knowledge of its nature and consequences.’

Planned Parenthood v. Danforth

, 428 U.S. 52, 67 (1976); and

“(3) The knowledgeable exercise of a woman’s decision to have an abortion depends on the extent to which the woman receives sufficient information to make an informed choice between two alternatives: giving birth or having an abortion.

“(b) Based on the findings in subsection (a) of this section, it is the purpose of this Act to:

“(1) Ensure that every woman considering an abortion receive complete information on the reality and status of her pregnancy and of her unborn child and that every woman submitting to an abortion do so only after giving her voluntary and informed consent to the abortion procedure;

“(2) Protect unborn children from a woman’s uninformed decision to have an abortion;

“(3) Reduce ‘the risk that a woman may elect an abortion, only to discover later, with devastating psychological consequences, that her decision was not fully informed’

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

, 505 U.S. 833, 882 (1992); and

“(4) Adopt the construction of the term ‘medical emergency’ accepted by the United States Supreme Court in

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

, 505 U.S. 833 (1992).”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 7/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed as creating or recognizing a right to abortion.
It is not the intention of this Act to make lawful an abortion that is currently unlawful.”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 8/HB 147, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For note on 2007 amendment of this Code
section, see 24 Ga. St. U. L.
Rev. 161 (2007).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-9A-6.1.
[Repealed] Civil and professional penalties for violations; prerequisites for seeking penalties.

History.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 299, § 6/HB 147; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 2/HB 509; Ga. L. 2012, p. 575, § 4/HB 954; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 9/HB 481, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 1/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Living Infants Fairness and Equality (LIFE) Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 2/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly of Georgia makes the following findings:”

“(1) In the founding of the United States of America, the State of Georgia and the several states affirmed that: ‘We hold these Truths to be self evident, that all Men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of Happiness — that to secure these Rights, Governments are instituted among men;’

“(2) To protect the fundamental rights of all persons, and specifically to protect the fundamental rights of particular classes of persons who had not previously been recognized under law, the 14th Amendment to the United States Constitution was ratified, providing that, ‘nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws’;

“(3) Modern medical science, not available decades ago, demonstrates that unborn children are a class of living, distinct persons and more expansive state recognition of unborn children as persons did not exist when

Planned Parenthood v. Casey

(1992) and

Roe v. Wade

(1973) established abortion related precedents;

“(4) The State of Georgia, applying reasoned judgment to the full body of modern medical science, recognizes the benefits of providing full legal recognition to an unborn child above the minimum requirements of federal law;

“(5) Article I, Section I, Paragraphs I and II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia affirm that ‘[n]o person shall be deprived of life, liberty, or property except by due process of law’; and that ‘[p]rotection to person and property is the paramount duty of government and shall be impartial and complete. No person shall be denied the equal protection of the laws’; and

“(6) It shall be the policy of the State of Georgia to recognize unborn children as natural persons.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 13/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any citizen of this state shall have standing and the right to intervene and defend in any action challenging the constitutionality of any portion of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 711, § 14/HB 481, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “All provisions of this Act shall be severable in accordance with Code Section 1-1-3.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 repeal of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (2019).

31-9A-7.
Preservation of patient anonymity in civil proceedings.

In any civil proceeding or action relating to this chapter or a breach of duty under this chapter, the court shall rule whether the anonymity of any female upon whom an abortion has been performed shall be preserved from public disclosure if she does not give her consent to such disclosure. The court, upon motion or sua sponte, shall make such a ruling and, upon determining that her anonymity should be preserved, shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses, and counsel and shall direct the sealing of the record and exclusion of individuals from courtrooms or hearing rooms to the extent necessary to safeguard her identity from public disclosure. Each such order shall be accompanied by specific written findings explaining why the anonymity of the female should be preserved from public disclosure, why the order is essential to that end, how the order is narrowly tailored to serve that interest, and why no reasonable less restrictive alternative exists. This Code section may not be construed to conceal the identity of the plaintiff or of witnesses from the defendant.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9A-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1450, § 6/HB 197.